Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Shaifer House and Port Gibson Battlefield

§ 39-5-121.
Restoration and operation of Shaifer House and accompanying land on Port Gibson Battlefield.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized to secure, preserve, restore, develop, interpret, operate and maintain the historic Shaifer House and accompanying land located on the Port Gibson Battlefield, subject to the appropriation of adequate funds by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 563, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999).

§ 39-5-123.
Cooperative agreements authorized.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the National Park Service, state and local governmental entities, nonprofit organizations, and any other groups, organizations or individuals that may be interested in the preservation and development of the Shaifer House and accompanying land and the Port Gibson Battlefield.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 563, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999).